Illinois, session 104th, HB5291.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-10 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/1-10)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 104-458)8    Sec. 1-10. Application. 9    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 10bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 11first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 12be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 13provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 14prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 15Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant 16entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 17instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 18solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 19July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 20Code and its intent.21    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 22funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 23assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:  HB5291- 2 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 2    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 3    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 4    this Code.5        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 6    Section 20-80.7        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 8    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.9        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 10    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 11    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 12    that individual.13        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.14        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 15    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 16    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 17    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 18    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate 19    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 20    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 21    contract.22        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 23    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 24    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 25    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 26    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor,   HB5291- 3 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 2    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 3    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 4    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.5        (8) (Blank).6        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 7    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.8        (10) (Blank). 9        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 10    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 11    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 12    design-build agreements entered into according to the 13    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 14    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.15        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 16    professional and artistic services entered into by the 17    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 18    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through 19    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 20    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 21    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 22    as well as the final approval by the members of the 23    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.24        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 25    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 26    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State   HB5291- 4 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 2    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 3    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 4    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 5    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 6    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 7    of the terms of the contract. 8        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 9    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 10    science services in consultation with and subject to the 11    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 12    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 13    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 14    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 15    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 16    writing with justification, waive any certification 17    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 18    for services which are currently provided by members of a 19    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 20    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 21    subcontracting shall be followed.22        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 23    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 24        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 25    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 26    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.  HB5291- 5 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 2    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 3    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 4    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 5    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 6    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 7    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 8    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 9    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 10    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 11    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 12    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 13    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 14    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 15    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 16    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 17    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 18    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section 19    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 20    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 21    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 22    the Illinois Municipal Code. 23        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 24    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 25    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 26    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act.   HB5291- 6 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 2    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 3    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 4    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 5    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 6    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 7    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 8    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 9    Medical Cannabis Program Act.10        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 11    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 12    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 13    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 14    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 15    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 16    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 17    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 18    to fall within this exemption and if the process is 19    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 20    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 21    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 22    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 23    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 24    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 25    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 26    the procurement of goods and services identified in   HB5291- 7 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 2    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 3    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 4    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 5    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 6    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 7    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 8    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 9    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 10    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 11    description of the supply or service provided, the total 12    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 13    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 14    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 15    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 16    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 17    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 18    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the 19    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 20    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 21    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).22        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 23    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 24    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 25    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 26    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to   HB5291- 8 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    complete the job application process and be considered for 2    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 3    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 4    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 5    the essential functions of the position held by that 6    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 7    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 8    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 9    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 10    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 11    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 12    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 13        For purposes of this paragraph (19):14        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 15    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 16    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 17    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 18    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.19        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 20    directly assists an individual with a disability in 21    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 22    device.23        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 24    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 25    describing an individual with a disability. 26        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the   HB5291- 9 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 2    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 3    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 4    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 5    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 6    Utilities Act, or a grid auditor pursuant to Section 7    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act. 8        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 9    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 10    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 11    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 12    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the 13    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 14    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 15    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 16    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 17    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 18    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 19    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 20    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 21    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 22    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 23    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 24    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 25    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 26        (22) Contracts for project management services and   HB5291- 10 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    system integration services required for the completion of 2    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 3    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 4    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 5    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 6    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 7    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 8    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 9    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 10    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 11        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 12    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits 13    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 14    good faith determination that it is necessary and 15    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 16    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 17    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 18    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 19    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 20    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 21    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 22    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 23        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 24    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 25    announcements, and public awareness and education 26    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the   HB5291- 11 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    providers of those services that inform the public on 2    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 3        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 4    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 5    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 6    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 7    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 8    shall only be used for products and services procured 9    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 10    procurements may include those necessary to design and 11    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 12    services. The procurements may include, but are not 13    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 14    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 15    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 16    technical assistance and professional development, design 17    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 18    implement management and operational structures, and 19    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 20    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 21    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 22    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 23    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 24    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 25    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 26    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60   HB5291- 12 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 2    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 3    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 4    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 5    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 6    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 7    after July 1, 2027. 8        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 9    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 10    particularly minority candidates for employment, 11    including: 12            (A) procurements related to registration fees for 13        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;14            (B) production of recruitment materials; and15            (C) other services related to recruitment and 16        retention of State employees.17        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 18    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 19    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 20    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 21    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 22    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 23    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 24    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 25    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 26    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement   HB5291- 13 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 2    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 3    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 4        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 5    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 6    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 7    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 8    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 9    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 10    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 11    within this exemption. 12        (28) Procurement expenditures that are necessary for 13    the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 14    Homeland Security to respond to a radiological incident, 15    to monitor a nuclear power plant, or to use at a nuclear 16    facility; to qualify for the exemption under this 17    paragraph, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 18    Office of Homeland Security must make a good faith 19    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 20    expenditure to fall within this exemption. A copy of the 21    contract for an expenditure under this item (28) shall be 22    made available to the Chief Procurement Office immediately 23    upon request. 24    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 25with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 26after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any   HB5291- 14 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 2or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 3procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 4of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 5contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 6Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 7report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 8November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 9annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 10chief procurement officer. 11    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 12procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the 13Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 14Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 15technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 16Illinois Power Agency Act. 17    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 18and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 19Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 20procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 21Illinois Lottery Law. 22    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 23Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 24assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 25to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 26facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power   HB5291- 15 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 2of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 3of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 4costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 5construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 6full duration of construction.7    (f) (Blank). 8    (g) (Blank).9    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 10contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 1111-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 12    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records 13necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 14expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 15Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 16privilege. 17    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 18Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 19of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 20Board Act. 21    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 22contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 23Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 24appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 25    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 26Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and   HB5291- 16 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 2Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 3funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 4Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 5    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 6funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 7assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 8Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 9necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 10Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 11the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 12Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 13(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 14103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 156-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 16eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25) 17    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 104-458)18    Sec. 1-10. Application. 19    (a) This Code applies only to procurements for which 20bidders, offerors, potential contractors, or contractors were 21first solicited on or after July 1, 1998. This Code shall not 22be construed to affect or impair any contract, or any 23provision of a contract, entered into based on a solicitation 24prior to the implementation date of this Code as described in 25Article 99, including, but not limited to, any covenant   HB5291- 17 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1entered into with respect to any revenue bonds or similar 2instruments. All procurements for which contracts are 3solicited between the effective date of Articles 50 and 99 and 4July 1, 1998 shall be substantially in accordance with this 5Code and its intent.6    (b) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of the 7funds with which the contracts are paid, including federal 8assistance moneys. This Code shall not apply to:9        (1) Contracts between the State and its political 10    subdivisions or other governments, or between State 11    governmental bodies, except as specifically provided in 12    this Code.13        (2) Grants, except for the filing requirements of 14    Section 20-80.15        (3) Purchase of care, except as provided in Section 16    5-30.6 of the Illinois Public Aid Code and this Section.17        (4) Hiring of an individual as an employee and not as 18    an independent contractor, whether pursuant to an 19    employment code or policy or by contract directly with 20    that individual.21        (5) Collective bargaining contracts.22        (6) Purchase of real estate, except that notice of 23    this type of contract with a value of more than $25,000 24    must be published in the Procurement Bulletin within 10 25    calendar days after the deed is recorded in the county of 26    jurisdiction. The notice shall identify the real estate   HB5291- 18 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    purchased, the names of all parties to the contract, the 2    value of the contract, and the effective date of the 3    contract.4        (7) Contracts necessary to prepare for anticipated 5    litigation, enforcement actions, or investigations, 6    provided that the chief legal counsel to the Governor 7    shall give his or her prior approval when the procuring 8    agency is one subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor, 9    and provided that the chief legal counsel of any other 10    procuring entity subject to this Code shall give his or 11    her prior approval when the procuring entity is not one 12    subject to the jurisdiction of the Governor.13        (8) (Blank).14        (9) Procurement expenditures by the Illinois 15    Conservation Foundation when only private funds are used.16        (10) (Blank). 17        (11) Public-private agreements entered into according 18    to the procurement requirements of Section 20 of the 19    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act and 20    design-build agreements entered into according to the 21    procurement requirements of Section 25 of the 22    Public-Private Partnerships for Transportation Act.23        (12) (A) Contracts for legal, financial, and other 24    professional and artistic services entered into by the 25    Illinois Finance Authority in which the State of Illinois 26    is not obligated. Such contracts shall be awarded through   HB5291- 19 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    a competitive process authorized by the members of the 2    Illinois Finance Authority and are subject to Sections 3    5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, and 50-37 of this Code, 4    as well as the final approval by the members of the 5    Illinois Finance Authority of the terms of the contract.6        (B) Contracts for legal and financial services entered 7    into by the Illinois Housing Development Authority in 8    connection with the issuance of bonds in which the State 9    of Illinois is not obligated. Such contracts shall be 10    awarded through a competitive process authorized by the 11    members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority and 12    are subject to Sections 5-30, 20-160, 50-13, 50-20, 50-35, 13    and 50-37 of this Code, as well as the final approval by 14    the members of the Illinois Housing Development Authority 15    of the terms of the contract. 16        (13) Contracts for services, commodities, and 17    equipment to support the delivery of timely forensic 18    science services in consultation with and subject to the 19    approval of the Chief Procurement Officer as provided in 20    subsection (d) of Section 5-4-3a of the Unified Code of 21    Corrections, except for the requirements of Sections 22    20-60, 20-65, 20-70, and 20-160 and Article 50 of this 23    Code; however, the Chief Procurement Officer may, in 24    writing with justification, waive any certification 25    required under Article 50 of this Code. For any contracts 26    for services which are currently provided by members of a   HB5291- 20 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    collective bargaining agreement, the applicable terms of 2    the collective bargaining agreement concerning 3    subcontracting shall be followed.4        On and after January 1, 2019, this paragraph (13), 5    except for this sentence, is inoperative. 6        (14) Contracts for participation expenditures required 7    by a domestic or international trade show or exhibition of 8    an exhibitor, member, or sponsor.9        (15) Contracts with a railroad or utility that 10    requires the State to reimburse the railroad or utilities 11    for the relocation of utilities for construction or other 12    public purpose. Contracts included within this paragraph 13    (15) shall include, but not be limited to, those 14    associated with: relocations, crossings, installations, 15    and maintenance. For the purposes of this paragraph (15), 16    "railroad" means any form of non-highway ground 17    transportation that runs on rails or electromagnetic 18    guideways and "utility" means: (1) public utilities as 19    defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, (2) 20    telecommunications carriers as defined in Section 13-202 21    of the Public Utilities Act, (3) electric cooperatives as 22    defined in Section 3.4 of the Electric Supplier Act, (4) 23    telephone or telecommunications cooperatives as defined in 24    Section 13-212 of the Public Utilities Act, (5) rural 25    water or wastewater waste water systems with 10,000 26    connections or less, (6) a holder as defined in Section   HB5291- 21 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    21-201 of the Public Utilities Act, and (7) municipalities 2    owning or operating utility systems consisting of public 3    utilities as that term is defined in Section 11-117-2 of 4    the Illinois Municipal Code. 5        (16) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 6    Department of Public Health to provide the delivery of 7    timely newborn screening services in accordance with the 8    Newborn Metabolic Screening Act. 9        (17) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 10    Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 11    Professional Regulation, the Department of Human Services, 12    and the Department of Public Health to implement the 13    Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program and Opioid 14    Alternative Pilot Program requirements and ensure access 15    to medical cannabis for patients with debilitating medical 16    conditions in accordance with the Compassionate Use of 17    Medical Cannabis Program Act.18        (18) This Code does not apply to any procurements 19    necessary for the Department of Agriculture, the 20    Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, the 21    Department of Human Services, the Department of Commerce 22    and Economic Opportunity, and the Department of Public 23    Health to implement the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act if 24    the applicable agency has made a good faith determination 25    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 26    to fall within this exemption and if the process is   HB5291- 22 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    conducted in a manner substantially in accordance with the 2    requirements of Sections 20-160, 25-60, 30-22, 50-5, 3    50-10, 50-10.5, 50-12, 50-13, 50-15, 50-20, 50-21, 50-35, 4    50-36, 50-37, 50-38, and 50-50 of this Code; however, for 5    Section 50-35, compliance applies only to contracts or 6    subcontracts over $100,000. Notice of each contract 7    entered into under this paragraph (18) that is related to 8    the procurement of goods and services identified in 9    paragraph (1) through (9) of this subsection shall be 10    published in the Procurement Bulletin within 14 calendar 11    days after contract execution. The Chief Procurement 12    Officer shall prescribe the form and content of the 13    notice. Each agency shall provide the Chief Procurement 14    Officer, on a monthly basis, in the form and content 15    prescribed by the Chief Procurement Officer, a report of 16    contracts that are related to the procurement of goods and 17    services identified in this subsection. At a minimum, this 18    report shall include the name of the contractor, a 19    description of the supply or service provided, the total 20    amount of the contract, the term of the contract, and the 21    exception to this Code utilized. A copy of any or all of 22    these contracts shall be made available to the Chief 23    Procurement Officer immediately upon request. The Chief 24    Procurement Officer shall submit a report to the Governor 25    and General Assembly no later than November 1 of each year 26    that includes, at a minimum, an annual summary of the   HB5291- 23 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    monthly information reported to the Chief Procurement 2    Officer. This exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after 3    June 25, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-27).4        (19) Acquisition of modifications or adjustments, 5    limited to assistive technology devices and assistive 6    technology services, adaptive equipment, repairs, and 7    replacement parts to provide reasonable accommodations (i) 8    that enable a qualified applicant with a disability to 9    complete the job application process and be considered for 10    the position such qualified applicant desires, (ii) that 11    modify or adjust the work environment to enable a 12    qualified current employee with a disability to perform 13    the essential functions of the position held by that 14    employee, (iii) to enable a qualified current employee 15    with a disability to enjoy equal benefits and privileges 16    of employment as are enjoyed by other similarly situated 17    employees without disabilities, and (iv) that allow a 18    customer, client, claimant, or member of the public 19    seeking State services full use and enjoyment of and 20    access to its programs, services, or benefits. 21        For purposes of this paragraph (19):22        "Assistive technology devices" means any item, piece 23    of equipment, or product system, whether acquired 24    commercially off the shelf, modified, or customized, that 25    is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional 26    capabilities of individuals with disabilities.  HB5291- 24 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1        "Assistive technology services" means any service that 2    directly assists an individual with a disability in 3    selection, acquisition, or use of an assistive technology 4    device.5        "Qualified" has the same meaning and use as provided 6    under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act when 7    describing an individual with a disability. 8        (20) Procurement expenditures necessary for the 9    Illinois Commerce Commission to hire third-party 10    facilitators pursuant to Sections 16-105.17 and 16-108.18 11    of the Public Utilities Act or an ombudsman pursuant to 12    Section 16-107.5 of the Public Utilities Act, a 13    facilitator pursuant to Section 16-105.17 of the Public 14    Utilities Act, a grid auditor pursuant to Section 15    16-105.10 of the Public Utilities Act, a facilitator, 16    expert, or consultant pursuant to Sections 16-126.2 and 17    16-202 of the Public Utilities Act, a procurement monitor 18    pursuant to Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities Act, 19    an ombudsperson pursuant to Section 20-145 of the Public 20    Utilities Act, or consultants and experts pursuant to 21    Section 5-15 of the Utility Data Access Act. 22        (21) Procurement expenditures for the purchase, 23    renewal, and expansion of software, software licenses, or 24    software maintenance agreements that support the efforts 25    of the Illinois State Police to enforce, regulate, and 26    administer the Firearm Owners Identification Card Act, the   HB5291- 25 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    Firearm Concealed Carry Act, the Firearms Restraining 2    Order Act, the Firearm Dealer License Certification Act, 3    the Law Enforcement Agencies Data System (LEADS), the 4    Uniform Crime Reporting Act, the Criminal Identification 5    Act, the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act, and 6    the Gun Trafficking Information Act, or establish or 7    maintain record management systems necessary to conduct 8    human trafficking investigations or gun trafficking or 9    other stolen firearm investigations. This paragraph (21) 10    applies to contracts entered into on or after January 10, 11    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116) and the 12    renewal of contracts that are in effect on January 10, 13    2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1116). 14        (22) Contracts for project management services and 15    system integration services required for the completion of 16    the State's enterprise resource planning project. This 17    exemption becomes inoperative 5 years after June 7, 2023 18    (the effective date of the changes made to this Section by 19    Public Act 103-8). This paragraph (22) applies to 20    contracts entered into on or after June 7, 2023 (the 21    effective date of the changes made to this Section by 22    Public Act 103-8) and the renewal of contracts that are in 23    effect on June 7, 2023 (the effective date of the changes 24    made to this Section by Public Act 103-8). 25        (23) Procurements necessary for the Department of 26    Insurance to implement the Illinois Health Benefits   HB5291- 26 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    Exchange Law if the Department of Insurance has made a 2    good faith determination that it is necessary and 3    appropriate for the expenditure to fall within this 4    exemption. The procurement process shall be conducted in a 5    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 6    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 7    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 8    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. This 9    paragraph is inoperative 5 years after June 27, 2023 (the 10    effective date of Public Act 103-103). 11        (24) Contracts for public education programming, 12    noncommercial sustaining announcements, public service 13    announcements, and public awareness and education 14    messaging with the nonprofit trade associations of the 15    providers of those services that inform the public on 16    immediate and ongoing health and safety risks and hazards. 17        (25) Procurements necessary for the Department of 18    Early Childhood to implement the Department of Early 19    Childhood Act if the Department has made a good faith 20    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 21    expenditure to fall within this exemption. This exemption 22    shall only be used for products and services procured 23    solely for use by the Department of Early Childhood. The 24    procurements may include those necessary to design and 25    build integrated, operational systems of programs and 26    services. The procurements may include, but are not   HB5291- 27 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    limited to, those necessary to align and update program 2    standards, integrate funding systems, design and establish 3    data and reporting systems, align and update models for 4    technical assistance and professional development, design 5    systems to manage grants and ensure compliance, design and 6    implement management and operational structures, and 7    establish new means of engaging with families, educators, 8    providers, and stakeholders. The procurement processes 9    shall be conducted in a manner substantially in accordance 10    with the requirements of Article 50 (ethics) and Sections 11    5-5 (Procurement Policy Board), 5-7 (Commission on Equity 12    and Inclusion), 20-80 (contract files), 20-120 13    (subcontractors), 20-155 (paperwork), 20-160 14    (ethics/campaign contribution prohibitions), 25-60 15    (prevailing wage), and 25-90 (prohibited and authorized 16    cybersecurity) of this Code. Beginning January 1, 2025, 17    the Department of Early Childhood shall provide a 18    quarterly report to the General Assembly detailing a list 19    of expenditures and contracts for which the Department 20    uses this exemption. This paragraph is inoperative on and 21    after July 1, 2027. 22        (26) Procurements that are necessary for increasing 23    the recruitment and retention of State employees, 24    particularly minority candidates for employment, 25    including: 26            (A) procurements related to registration fees for   HB5291- 28 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1        job fairs and other outreach and recruitment events;2            (B) production of recruitment materials; and3            (C) other services related to recruitment and 4        retention of State employees.5        The exemption under this paragraph (26) applies only 6    if the State agency has made a good faith determination 7    that it is necessary and appropriate for the expenditure 8    to fall within this paragraph (26). The procurement 9    process under this paragraph (26) shall be conducted in a 10    manner substantially in accordance with the requirements 11    of Sections 20-160 and 25-60 and Article 50 of this Code. A 12    copy of these contracts shall be made available to the 13    Chief Procurement Officer immediately upon request. 14    Nothing in this paragraph (26) authorizes the replacement 15    or diminishment of State responsibilities in hiring or the 16    positions that effectuate that hiring. This paragraph (26) 17    is inoperative on and after June 30, 2029. 18        (27) Procurements necessary for the Department of 19    Healthcare and Family Services to implement changes to the 20    State's Integrated Eligibility System to ensure the 21    system's compliance with federal implementation mandates 22    and deadlines, if the Department of Healthcare and Family 23    Services has made a good faith determination that it is 24    necessary and appropriate for the procurement to fall 25    within this exemption. 26        (28) Procurement expenditures necessary for the   HB5291- 29 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1    Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 2    Homeland Security to respond to a radiological incident, 3    monitor a nuclear power plant, or use at a nuclear 4    facility; to qualify for the exemption under this 5    paragraph, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 6    Office of Homeland Security must make a good faith 7    determination that it is necessary and appropriate for the 8    expenditure to fall within this exemption. A copy of the 9    contract for an expenditure under this item (28) shall be 10    made available to the Chief Procurement Office immediately 11    upon request. 12    Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for contracts 13with an annual value of more than $100,000 entered into on or 14after October 1, 2017 under an exemption provided in any 15paragraph of this subsection (b), except paragraph (1), (2), 16or (5), each State agency shall post to the appropriate 17procurement bulletin the name of the contractor, a description 18of the supply or service provided, the total amount of the 19contract, the term of the contract, and the exception to the 20Code utilized. The chief procurement officer shall submit a 21report to the Governor and General Assembly no later than 22November 1 of each year that shall include, at a minimum, an 23annual summary of the monthly information reported to the 24chief procurement officer. 25    (c) This Code does not apply to the electric power 26procurement process provided for under Section 1-75 of the   HB5291- 30 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1Illinois Power Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public 2Utilities Act. This Code does not apply to the procurement of 3technical and policy experts pursuant to Section 1-129 of the 4Illinois Power Agency Act. 5    (d) Except for Section 20-160 and Article 50 of this Code, 6and as expressly required by Section 9.1 of the Illinois 7Lottery Law, the provisions of this Code do not apply to the 8procurement process provided for under Section 9.1 of the 9Illinois Lottery Law. 10    (e) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 11Capital Development Board to retain a person or entity to 12assist the Capital Development Board with its duties related 13to the determination of costs of a clean coal SNG brownfield 14facility, as defined by Section 1-10 of the Illinois Power 15Agency Act, as required in subsection (h-3) of Section 9-220 16of the Public Utilities Act, including calculating the range 17of capital costs, the range of operating and maintenance 18costs, or the sequestration costs or monitoring the 19construction of clean coal SNG brownfield facility for the 20full duration of construction.21    (f) (Blank). 22    (g) (Blank).23    (h) This Code does not apply to the process to procure or 24contracts entered into in accordance with Sections 11-5.2 and 2511-5.3 of the Illinois Public Aid Code. 26    (i) Each chief procurement officer may access records   HB5291- 31 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1necessary to review whether a contract, purchase, or other 2expenditure is or is not subject to the provisions of this 3Code, unless such records would be subject to attorney-client 4privilege. 5    (j) This Code does not apply to the process used by the 6Capital Development Board to retain an artist or work or works 7of art as required in Section 14 of the Capital Development 8Board Act. 9    (k) This Code does not apply to the process to procure 10contracts, or contracts entered into, by the State Board of 11Elections or the State Electoral Board for hearing officers 12appointed pursuant to the Election Code. 13    (l) This Code does not apply to the processes used by the 14Illinois Student Assistance Commission to procure supplies and 15services paid for from the private funds of the Illinois 16Prepaid Tuition Fund. As used in this subsection (l), "private 17funds" means funds derived from deposits paid into the 18Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund and the earnings thereon. 19    (m) This Code shall apply regardless of the source of 20funds with which contracts are paid, including federal 21assistance moneys. Except as specifically provided in this 22Code, this Code shall not apply to procurement expenditures 23necessary for the Department of Public Health to conduct the 24Healthy Illinois Survey in accordance with Section 2310-431 of 25the Department of Public Health Powers and Duties Law of the 26Civil Administrative Code of Illinois.   HB5291- 32 -LRB104 18422 HLH 31864 b1(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-103, eff. 6-27-23; 2103-570, eff. 1-1-24; 103-580, eff. 12-8-23; 103-594, eff. 36-25-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25; 104-2, 4eff. 6-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; 104-458, eff. 6-1-26; 5revised 1-12-26.) 6    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 7changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 8that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 9represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 10not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 11made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 12Public Act. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.